Nevada, session 83, AB184.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association
shall not penalize, retaliate against or otherwise take any adverse
action against a school or person for advocating for or against any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
policy, including, without limitation, by communicating with a
member of the Legislative Branch, as defined in NRS 218H.090,
testifying before a legislative committee or communicating data,
views or arguments on a policy to a public body, as defined in
NRS 241.015.
Sec. 3. 1. A school or any person or organization
associated with a school, including, without limitation,
administration, staff, coaches, pupils, parents or clubs for
supporters, shall not engage in athletic recruitment. Any violation
of this subsection by a person or organization associated with a
school shall be deemed to be a violation by the school.
2. A pupil shall not transfer to or otherwise enroll in a school
as the result of athletic recruitment. A pupil who violates this
section is ineligible to participate and practice in a sanctioned
sport at that school.
3. Any person who believes that a violation of this section has
occurred may file a complaint with the Nevada Interscholastic
Activities Association. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association shall investigate such a complaint. If the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association determines, after an
investigation, that the complaint is not meritless, the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association shall hold a hearing on the
complaint in accordance with procedures established by
regulation of the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association.
4. If, after conducting a hearing pursuant to subsection 3, the
Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association determines that a
school has engaged in athletic recruitment, the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association shall impose the following
penalties:
(a) For the first violation, the school must be placed on
probation and any coach or member of his or her staff who was
involved in the athletic recruitment must be suspended for not less
than:
(1) The remainder of the current season of the sport to
which the violation relates, if the suspension is imposed during the
season; and
(2) The entirety of the next full season of the sport to which
the violation relates that immediately follows the imposition of the
suspension;
(b) For the second violation, any coach or member of his or
her staff who was involved in the athletic recruitment must be
suspended for not less than 1 school year; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(c) For the third violation, any coach or member of his or her
staff who was involved in the athletic recruitment must be
dismissed from his or her position on the athletic staff and
suspended from coaching at any school for not less than 2
calendar years.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Athletic recruitment” means any effort to persuade,
pressure, urge or entice a pupil to enroll in or transfer to a school
for athletic purposes, including, without limitation:
(1) Communicating through social media, mail, brochures
or other media directed towards the pupil that compares schools or
athletic programs or teams or describes the athletic assets of the
school with which the sender is affiliated; and
(2) Initiating or engaging in persuasive interviews or
communications with the pupil.
(b) “Social media” means any electronic service or account or
electronic content, including, without limitation, videos,
photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts, instant and text
messages, live chat, mobile applications, online services or
Internet website profiles.
Sec. 4. 1. A pupil who transfers from a school to another
school is immediately eligible to participate and practice in any
sanctioned sport or other interscholastic activity or event at the
school to which the pupil transfers if the pupil, or a parent or legal
guardian of the pupil, submits to the Nevada Interscholastic
Activities Association a request for a waiver of any period of
ineligibility based on transferring schools, the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association approves the request
pursuant to this section and the pupil is otherwise eligible to
participate and practice in the sanctioned sport or other
interscholastic activity or event. If the Nevada Interscholastic
Activities Association does not take action on a request submitted
pursuant to this section within 30 days after the request is
submitted, the request shall be deemed approved.
2. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall
approve a request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 if the pupil,
or the parent or legal guardian of the pupil, establishes by a
preponderance of the evidence that the pupil transferred to the
school because:
(a) Of the order or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction
that directly or indirectly results in the pupil transferring schools,
including, without limitation, any order issued pursuant to chapter
432B of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(b) The pupil was a victim of assault or bullying at the school
in which he or she was previously enrolled and the assault or
bullying was likely to continue if the pupil had remained enrolled
at the school, as established by evidence submitted pursuant to
subsection 3.
(c) The pupil was enrolled in an academic program or a
Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corp Program that was
discontinued by the school in which he or she was previously
enrolled.
(d) The pupil was a member of a team that participates in a
sanctioned sport that was diminished or eliminated due to
budgetary or administrative decisions for the school from which
the pupil is transferring.
(e) The pupil is in the custody of an agency which provides
child welfare services, as defined in NRS 432B.030, and changes
residences as a result of a change related to his or her placement.
(f) The pupil is a homeless pupil, as determined by a school
pursuant to NRS 388.205, and has changed residences.
(g) The parent or legal guardian was discharged or released
from the uniformed service under conditions other than
dishonorable and the pupil is returning to the school in which the
pupil was previously enrolled or is transferring to a school in a
school district in which the parent or legal guardian of the pupil
resides.
(h) The pupil was required by the board of trustees of a school
district to transfer, and the decision of the board of trustees was
not disciplinary.
(i) The transfer is in the best interest of the pupil because of a
mental health or emotional condition, as documented by a letter
from:
(1) The school counselor at the school in which the pupil is
enrolled; and
(2) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of
NRS or a licensed psychologist.
(j) The immediate family of the pupil is experiencing financial
hardship, as verified by documentation of the financial status of
the parent or legal guardian of the pupil, which may include,
without limitation, documentation specifically relating to the
status of the pupil as a homeless pupil under the McKinney-Vento
Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11301 et seq.
(k) The school in which the pupil was previously enrolled or
the school district within which the school is located provided the
public with notice stating that the school:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(1) Will close permanently; or
(2) Will be closed temporarily for purposes relating to a
renovation or repair of the school.
3. A request made pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2
must be accompanied by evidence of one or more substantiated
incidents of assault or bullying of which the pupil who is the
subject of the request was a victim. Such evidence may include,
without limitation:
(a) Documentation produced by the school where the pupil
was previously enrolled, the school district in which that school
was located or law enforcement; and
(b) The testimony of witnesses or law enforcement.
4. The rules and regulations of the Nevada Interscholastic
Activities Association adopted pursuant to NRS 385B.060 must
provide for adequate review procedures to review and determine
whether to approve requests submitted pursuant to subsection 1.
The review procedures must include, without limitation:
(a) The review of a request submitted pursuant to subsection 1
by the Executive Director, or such staff of the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association as the Executive Director
may designate, and the approval of such a request, without a
hearing before a hearing officer pursuant to NRS 385B.100, if the
request and documentation submitted with the request establish by
a preponderance of the evidence that the pupil is eligible for the
waiver pursuant to subsection 2.
(b) Upon the filing of a written appeal with the Executive
Director pursuant to NRS 385B.100, the review by a hearing
officer appointed pursuant to NRS 385B.100 of a decision denying
a request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 and the conduct of a
hearing before that hearing officer not later than 60 days after the
date on which the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association
received the request pursuant to subsection 1.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Financial hardship” does not include the loss or
reduction of a scholarship, grant or other financial assistance
provided for the purpose of enabling a pupil to attend a private
school.
(b) “Homeless pupil” means a homeless child or youth, as
defined in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
Sec. 4.5. NRS 385B.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.060 1. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association shall adopt rules and regulations in the manner provided
for state agencies by chapter 233B of NRS as may be necessary to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
carry out the provisions of this chapter. The regulations must
include provisions governing the eligibility and participation of
homeschooled children in interscholastic activities and events. In
addition to the regulations governing eligibility, a homeschooled
child who wishes to participate must have on file with the school
district in which the child resides a current notice of intent of a
homeschooled child to participate in programs and activities
pursuant to NRS 388D.070.
2. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall
adopt regulations setting forth:
(a) The standards of safety for each event, competition or other
activity engaged in by a spirit squad of a school that is a member of
the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association, which must
substantially comply with the spirit rules of the National Federation
of State High School Associations, or its successor organization;
and
(b) The qualifications required for a person to become a coach
of a spirit squad.
3. If the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association intends
to adopt, repeal or amend a policy, rule or regulation concerning or
affecting homeschooled children, the Association shall consult with
the Northern Nevada Homeschool Advisory Council and the
Southern Nevada Homeschool Advisory Council, or their successor
organizations, to provide those Councils with a reasonable
opportunity to submit data, opinions or arguments, orally or in
writing, concerning the proposal or change. The Association shall
consider all written and oral submissions respecting the proposal or
change before taking final action.
4. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall not
adopt, repeal or amend any policy, practice, rule or regulation
which concerns or affects pupils, public schools or school districts
in a manner that does not conform with the requirements of
subsection 1, and any action to adopt, repeal or amend a policy,
practice, rule or regulation in violation of this subsection is void
and unenforceable.
5. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association may not
establish a new conference, class, region or league or reclassify or
realign a school within any conference, class, region or league
unless the Association does so by regulation in a manner that
conforms with the requirements of subsection 1.
6. As used in this section, “spirit squad” means any team or
other group of persons that is formed for the purpose of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(a) Leading cheers or rallies to encourage support for a team that
participates in a sport that is sanctioned by the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association; or
(b) Participating in a competition against another team or other
group of persons to determine the ability of each team or group of
persons to engage in an activity specified in paragraph (a).
Sec. 5. NRS 385B.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.090 1. The rules and regulations of the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association adopted pursuant to NRS
385B.060 must provide for adequate review procedures to determine
and review disputes arising in regard to the Association’s decisions
and activities.
2. A decision of the Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association , [or] a decision of a person designated by the
Association to review and make final decisions on disputes on
behalf of the Association pursuant to the rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 385B.060 or a decision of a school
district or its designee on a matter which is appealed to the school
district pursuant to NRS 385B.100 must not be stayed by a court
pending the court’s final judgment on the matter.
Sec. 6. NRS 385B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.100 1. Any pupil or school that is aggrieved by a final
decision or order made pursuant to a regulation adopted by the
Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association by:
(a) An administrator of a school district who is responsible for
interpreting and enforcing the regulations adopted by the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association;
(b) A panel of principals chosen from schools located in a
school district; or
(c) The Executive Director,
 may file a written appeal with the Executive Director. [The]
Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the Executive
Director shall appoint a hearing officer to review the decision or
order that is the subject of the appeal. Except as otherwise provided
in section 4 of this act, the hearing officer shall conduct a hearing
not later than 30 days after the appeal has been filed with the
Executive Director.
2. A hearing officer appointed pursuant to subsection 1 shall
issue a decision or order in writing and shall cause a copy of the
decision or order to be served on each party to the appeal or counsel
for the party. The decision or order must include a summary of the
appeal that includes:
(a) A statement of the relevant facts;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(b) A statement of the issues presented and the opposing
arguments of the parties;
(c) An analysis of the arguments; and
(d) The conclusion of the hearing officer.
3. Not later than 10 days after the issuance of the decision or
order of the hearing officer, the Executive Director shall cause a
copy of the summary required by subsection 2 to be posted on the
Internet website of the Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association. The summary must be redacted as necessary to prevent
the identification of any person involved in the appeal who is less
than 18 years of age, which information is confidential. The
redacted summary is a public record and must be open to public
inspection as provided in NRS 239.010.
4. Any pupil or school that is aggrieved by a decision or order
issued pursuant to subsection 2 by a hearing officer may appeal to
the school district within which the pupil is enrolled or the school
is located, as applicable, or a person designated by the school
district to hear such appeals within 30 days after the decision or
order is issued. The school district or person designated by the
school district may affirm, modify or reverse the decision or order
of the hearing officer.
5. As used in this section, “Executive Director” means the
Executive Director of the Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association.
Sec. 7. NRS 385B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.130 1. Any rules and regulations adopted by the
Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association governing the
eligibility of a pupil who transfers from one school to another school
to participate in an interscholastic activity or event must apply
equally to public schools and to private schools that are members of
the Association.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary [,] and
except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a pupil [who is a
child of a military family and transferred schools pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 388F of NRS] is immediately eligible to
participate and practice in any sanctioned sport or other
interscholastic activity or event at the school to which the pupil
transfers [.] , regardless of the zone of attendance in which the
pupil resides, if the pupil:
(a) Is a child of a military family and transferred schools
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388F of NRS;
(b) Transfers to a school that uses a lottery system to
determine which pupils may enroll and has not previously
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
transferred from one school to another school under such
circumstances; or
(c) Transfers to a school before his or her enrollment in grade
10 and has not previously transferred from one school to another
school under such circumstances.
3. The provisions of subsection 2 do not apply to a pupil who
transfers to a school as the result of athletic recruitment in
violation of section 3 of this act.
Sec. 8. NRS 385B.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.140 [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 3 of
this act, a pupil who enrolls in grade 9 at:
1. A public school and who resides within the zone of
attendance of the public school at the time of enrollment is
immediately eligible to participate and practice in a sanctioned sport
at the public school, regardless of whether the pupil:
(a) Resided in a different zone of attendance before the pupil’s
enrollment in grade 9; or
(b) Attended a school other than a public school before the
pupil’s enrollment in grade 9.
2. A private school is immediately eligible to participate and
practice in a sanctioned sport at the private school, regardless of
whether the pupil attended a school other than a private school
before the pupil’s enrollment in grade 9.
Sec. 9. NRS 385B.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.170 [1.] A school district, public school or private
school shall not prescribe any regulations, rules, policies, procedures
or requirements governing the:
1. Eligibility of homeschooled children or children of a
military family who transferred schools pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 388F of NRS to participate in interscholastic activities and
events pursuant to this chapter; [or]
2. Eligibility to participate in interscholastic activities and
events pursuant to this chapter of children who:
(a) Transfer to a school that uses a lottery system to determine
which pupils may enroll and have not previously transferred from
one school to another school under such circumstances; or
(b) Transfer schools before enrolling in grade 10 and have not
previously transferred from one school to another school under
such circumstances; or
3. Participation of [homeschooled] children [or children of a
military family who transferred schools pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 388F of NRS] described in subsections 1 and 2 in
interscholastic activities and events pursuant to this chapter,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
 that are more restrictive than the provisions governing eligibility
and participation prescribed by the Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association pursuant to NRS 385B.060 and 385B.130.
Sec. 10. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association
shall, on or before July 1, 2026, amend its rules and regulations in
the manner provided for state agencies by chapter 233B of NRS as
necessary to conform with the provisions of sections 1 to 9,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 10, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)